Utah statutes.
61-2c-501.   Fund created.

(1)  There is created a restricted special revenue fund known as the "Residential Mortgage Loan Education, Research, and Recovery Fund."

(2)  The interest earned on the fund shall be deposited into the fund.

(3)  At the beginning of each fiscal year, the division shall make available

$100,000 in the fund to satisfy final judgments rendered against a person licensed under this chapter.

